src/scripts/Macedonian/numbers.foma
define Translate 
 [
 MascUnit -> || _ wnum | dec | [PowerOfThousandSymbol  - thn - thns - bln - blns]  ,, 
 FemUnit -> || _  [thn | thns | bln | blns] ,, 
 MascUnit -> || dp Digit* _ Digit* dec ,,   # right of decimal point
 Teen [teen:0] -> || _ ,, 
 Ten [ten:0] -> || _ ,, 
	Hundred [hnd:0] -> || _ ,, 
	and ->  и || _ ,, 
	%, ->  запирка || _ ?+ .#. ,, 
	%. ->  точка || _ ?+ .#. ,, 
 [[thns|thn]:илјадити|[mlns|mln]:милјонити|[blns|bln]:милијардити|[tlns|tln]:трилионити] @->  ||  _  wnum ord MaleOrdSuffix ,, 
 [[thns|thn]:илјадита|[mlns|mln]:милјонита|[blns|bln]:милијардита|[tlns|tln]:трилионити] @->  ||  _  wnum ord FemaleOrdSuffix ,, 
 [[thns|thn]:илјадито|[mlns|mln]:милјонито|[blns|bln]:милијардито|[tlns|tln]:трилионити] @->  ||  _  wnum ord NeuterOrdSuffix  ,,
 [[thns|thn]:илјадитиот|[mlns|mln]:милјонитиот|[blns|bln]:милијардитиот|[tlns|tln]:трилионитиот] @->  ||  _  wnum ord MaleDefOrdSuffix ,, 
 [[thns|thn]:илјадитата|[mlns|mln]:милјонитата|[blns|bln]:милијардитата|[tlns|tln]:трилионити] @->  ||  _  wnum ord FemaleDefOrdSuffix ,, 
 [[thns|thn]:илјадитото|[mlns|mln]:милјонитото|[blns|bln]:милијардитото|[tlns|tln]:трилионити] @->  ||  _  wnum ord NeuterDefOrdSuffix 
 ]
 .o. [ 
	[thn:илјада | mln:милион | bln:милијарда | tln:трилион] -> || _    ,, 
	[thns:илјади | mlns:милјони | blns:милијарди | tlns:трилиони] ->  || _  
	]; 

define NumberRules 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(thns)  .o. 
 SeparatePowerOfThousand(mlns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(blns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(tlns)  .o. 
RemoveSilentGroups .o. 
SeparateHundreds  .o. 
SeparateTens  .o. 
    #MarkOrdPowerOfThousand .o.
 MarkTeens  
 .o. InsertAnds  .o. 
 RemoveZeros  .o. 
 PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular .o. 
 preTranslate .o.  
  RemoveOnes   .o.
  processOrdinals 
	
	.o. [%.|%,|wnum] -> нула ... || .#. _   # hack to replace lost zero in front of dec. point
   .o. Translate   .o. [ [ord OrdSuffix]:0 -> || wnum _ .#. ]
	
   .o. 	[dp:0|dec:0|wnum:0] -> || _;

source romans.foma
regex ConvertRomanToDecimal .o. ArabicNumber .o. tagRules .o. NumberRules ; 
